Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 2
REIMBURSEMENT OF COST OF CARE BY INMATES TO COUNTIES

17-26-201 to 17-26-208. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire part repealed, p. 1362, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This part 2 was added in 1989. For amendments to this part 2 prior to its repeal in 1994, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.